District of Columbia statutes.
16-4206

Prohibited mediator reports.

(a)

Except as permitted in subsection (b) of this section, a mediator may not make a report, assessment, evaluation, recommendation, finding, or other communication regarding a mediation to a court, administrative agency, arbitrator, or other authority that may make a ruling on the dispute that is the subject of the mediation.

(b)

A mediator may disclose:

(1)

Whether the mediation occurred or has terminated, whether a settlement was reached, and attendance;

(2)

A mediation communication as permitted under § 16-4205; or

(3)

A mediation communication evidencing abuse, neglect, abandonment, or exploitation of an individual to a public agency responsible for protecting individuals against such mistreatment.

(c)

A communication made in violation of subsection (a) of this section may not be considered by a court, administrative agency, arbitrator, or other authority that may make a ruling on the dispute that is the subject of the mediation.

History

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-87, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1075

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Mediation Act.